Georgia, session 2025_26, HB839.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act entitled "An Act to create a board of county commissioners for the county of
Jackson," approved December 18, 1901 (Ga. L. 1901, p. 257), as amended, particularly by
an Act approved March 16, 1999 (Ga. L. 1999, p. 3570), is amended by revising subsection
(b) of Section 5 as follows:
"(b)(1) In the event a vacancy occurs on the board of commissioners when at least 180
days remain in the unexpired term of office, the election superintendent of Jackson
County, within 15 days after the vacancy occurs, shall issue the call for a special election
to fill the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term. Such special election shall be
called and conducted as provided in Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the O.C.G.A., the 'Georgia
H. B. 839
- 1 -

LC 47 3560/AP
Election Code,' as now or hereafter amended. Any person elected in a special election to
fill such a vacancy shall take office immediately upon certification of the results of such
special election and qualification. If such vacancy is in the office of chairperson of the
board of commissioners, the vice chairperson of the board shall exercise the powers and
duties of the chairperson for the period beginning on the date the vacancy occurs and
ending on the date the successor chairperson takes office for the remainder of the
unexpired term following the special election provided for in this subsection.
(2) Until such time as a permanent successor can be elected as provided for in
paragraph (1) of this subsection, the remaining members of the board of commissioners,
at their discretion, may appoint a qualified individual to temporarily fill any such
vacancy. Any such person appointed to temporarily fill a vacancy shall be appointed
using the same procedures as provided for in subsection (c) of this section."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 839
- 2 -